Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 27
BUSINESS AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS

Sec.

§ 26-2701. Purpose of chapter.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

Promote economic development by encouraging the formation of business and industrial development corporations, a new type of private institution, to help meet the financing assistance and management assistance needs of business firms.

Provide for a system of licensing, regulation, and enforcement that will enable business and industrial development corporations to satisfy eligibility requirements to participate, if they so choose, in the program of the small business administration pursuant to section 7(a) of the small business act, Public Law 85-536, 15 U.S.C. section 636(a), and other programs for which they may be eligible.

Provide for a system of licensing, regulation, and enforcement designed to prevent fraud, conflict of interest, and mismanagement, and to promote competent management, accurate recordkeeping, and appropriate communication with shareholders in order to provide the following:

Comfort to prospective shareholders in order to facilitate equity investments in business and industrial development corporations;

Comfort to prospective debt sources in order to facilitate the borrowing of money by business and industrial development corporations; and

Protection of the general reputation of business and industrial development corporations as a type of institution in order to increase the confidence of prospective equity investors in and prospective debt sources for those institutions.

It is hereby further declared that all of the foregoing are public purposes and uses for which public moneys may be expended or granted and that such activities are governmental functions and serve a public purpose in improving or otherwise benefiting the people of this state; that the necessity of enacting the provisions hereinafter set forth is in the public interest and is hereby so declared as a matter of express legislative determination.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2701, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 1, p. 406.

§ 26-2702. Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Advisor” means a person who regularly provides legal, accounting, or management services or advice to a licensee.

“Affiliate” means, if used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, a person controlling or controlled by that specified person, or a person controlled by a person who also controls the specified person.

“Associate” means, if used with respect to a licensee:

A controlling person, director, officer, agent, or advisor of that licensee.

A director, officer, or partner of a person referred to in paragraph (a).

A person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a person referred to in paragraph (a) directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

Any close relative of any person referred to in paragraph (a).

A person of which a person referred to in paragraphs (a) through (d) is a director or officer.

A person in which a person referred to in paragraphs (a) through (d), or any combination of those persons acting in concert, owns or controls, directly or indirectly, a twenty percent (20%) or greater equity interest.

A person who is in a relationship referred to in this subsection, within six (6) months before or after a licensee provides financing assistance, shall be considered to be in that relationship as of the date that licensee provides that financing assistance.

If a licensee, in order to protect its interests, designates a person to serve as a director of, officer of, or in any capacity in the management of a business firm to which that licensee provides financing assistance, that person shall not, on that account, be considered to have a relationship with that business firm. This subdivision does not apply if the person has, directly or indirectly, any other financial interest in the business firm or if the person, at any time before the licensee provides the financing assistance, served as a director of, officer of, or in any other capacity in the management of the business firm for a period of thirty (30) days or more.

“BIDCO” means a business and industrial development corporation licensed under this chapter.

“Business firm” means a person that transacts business on a regular and continual basis, or a person that proposes to transact business on a regular and continual basis.

“Close relative” means parent, child, sibling, spouse, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, or sister-in-law.

“Closing services” means services performed in connection with the providing of financing assistance. Closing services includes, but is not limited to, appraising property and preparing credit reports. Closing services does not include a service performed after the providing of financing assistance.

“Control” means, if used with respect to a specified person, the power to direct or cause the direction of, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, the management and policies of that specified person, whether through the ownership of voting securities; by contract, other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services; or otherwise. A natural person shall not be considered to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of that person. A person who, directly or indirectly, owns of record or beneficially holds with power to vote, or holds proxies with discretionary authority to vote, twenty percent (20%) or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by a corporation shall be rebuttably presumed to control that corporation.

“Controlling person” means, if used with respect to a specified person, a person who controls that specified person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

“Corporate name” means the name of a corporation as set forth in the articles of incorporation of that corporation.

“Department” means the department of finance.

“Director” means the director of the department of finance.

“Idaho corporation” means a corporation incorporated pursuant to title 30, Idaho Code.

“Idaho nonprofit corporation” means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated pursuant to title 30, Idaho Code.

“Incorporating statute” means that part of title 30, Idaho Code, under which a licensee is incorporated.

“Insolvent” means a licensee that ceases to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, that cannot pay its debts as they become due, or whose liabilities exceed its assets.

“Interests of the licensee” includes the interests of shareholders of the licensee.

“License” means a license issued under this chapter authorizing an Idaho corporation to transact business as a BIDCO.

“Licensee” means an Idaho corporation which is licensed under this chapter.

“Officer” means:

If used with respect to a corporation, a person appointed or designated as an officer of that corporation by or pursuant to applicable law or the articles of incorporation, or bylaws of that corporation, or a person who performs with respect to that corporation functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation.

If used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person or a corporation, a person who performs with respect to that specified person functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation with respect to that corporation.

“Order” means an approval, consent, authorization, exemption, denial, prohibition, or requirement applicable to a specific case issued by the director. Order includes a condition of a license and an agreement made by a person with the director under this chapter.

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, joint venture, partnership, trust, business trust, syndicate, association, joint stock company, corporation, cooperative, government, agency of a government, or any other organization. If used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specified person, person includes a combination of two (2) or more persons acting in concert.

“Principal shareholder” means a person that owns, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, securities representing ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation.

“Short-term financing assistance” means financing assistance with a term of not more than five (5) years.

“Subject person” means a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee; a director, officer, or employee of a licensee or of a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee; or any other person who participates in the conduct of the business of a licensee.

“Subsidiary” means, if used with respect to a licensee, a company or business firm which the licensee holds control of as permitted by section 26-2718(1)(b), (c) or (d), Idaho Code.
(27) “This chapter” includes an order issued or rule promulgated under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2702, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2703. Powers of director.

The director shall administer this chapter. The director may issue orders and promulgate rules that, in the opinion of the director, are necessary to execute, enforce, and effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Any rules promulgated shall be promulgated in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The director may promulgate rules pursuant to this chapter and chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, prior to the effective date of this chapter.

Whenever the director issues an order or license under this chapter, the director may impose conditions that are necessary, in the opinion of the director, to carry out this chapter and the purposes of this chapter.

The director may honor applications from interested persons for declaratory rulings regarding any provisions of this chapter and may seek declaratory judgments from a court of competent jurisdiction.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official action of the director under this chapter is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

The director is hereby authorized to use a reasonable amount of excess funds, if the director deems them to be available, from the finance administrative account for the purpose of preparing and distributing informational materials describing the provisions of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2703, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2704. Applications — Investigations — Service of process.

An application filed with the director under this chapter shall be in such a form and contain such information as the director may require.

The director may make public or private investigations within or outside this state that the director considers necessary to determine whether to approve an application filed with the director under the provisions of this chapter, to determine whether a person has violated or is about to violate the provisions of this chapter, to aid in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or to aid in issuing an order or promulgating a rule under this chapter.

For purposes of an investigation, examination, or other proceeding under this chapter, the director may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director considers relevant or material to the proceeding.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the director or to testify with respect to a matter concerning which the person may be lawfully questioned, the court, on application of the director, may issue an order requiring the attendance of the person and the giving of testimony or production of evidence.

Service of process authorized to be made by the director in connection with a noncriminal proceeding under this chapter may be made by registered or certified mail.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2704, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2705. Fees.

The director shall set the fees required under this chapter at a level sufficient to cover the department’s expenses which arise due to the administration of the provisions of this chapter provided, the fees shall be set within the parameters set forth in this section.

The fee for filing an application for a license shall not exceed twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The fee for filing an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee shall not exceed twelve hundred and fifty dollars ($1,250).

The fee for filing an application for approval for a licensee to merge with another corporation, an application for approval for a licensee to purchase all or substantially all of the business of another person, or an application for approval for a licensee to sell all or substantially all of its business or of the business of any of its offices to another licensee shall not exceed twelve hundred and fifty dollars ($1,250). If two (2) or more applications relating to the same merger, purchase, or sale are filed, the fee for filing each application shall be the quotient determined by dividing the applicable fee set by the director by the number of the applications.

The annual fee for a licensee shall not exceed twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500), payable on or before June 30 of each year.

Whenever the director examines a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee, within ten (10) days after receiving a statement from the director, the licensee shall pay a fee established by the director based on the number of examiner hours used for the examination, plus travel expenses. Examiner time shall be billed at a rate not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per hour and not more than forty dollars ($40.00) per hour.

A fee for filing an application with the director is nonrefundable and shall be paid at the time the application is filed with the director.

A fee collected under this section shall be deposited into the finance administrative account pursuant to section 67-2702, Idaho Code. Money in this account shall be used only for the operation of the department.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2705, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2706. Required recordkeeping — Independent audit — Application to outside recordkeepers — Report required.

A licensee shall make and keep books, accounts, and other records in such a form and manner as the director may require. These records shall be kept at such a place and shall be preserved for such a length of time as the director may specify.

The director may require by order that a licensee write down any asset on its books and records to a valuation which represents its then value. In addition, the director may require an appraisal of any assets of a licensee by an independent appraiser approved by the director.

The director may require a licensee to file with the director, not more than ninety (90) days after the close of each calendar year or a longer period if specified by the director, an audit report containing all of the following:

Financial statements, including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in capital accounts, and statement of changes in financial position or, for a licensee that is an Idaho nonprofit corporation, comparable financial statements for, or as of the end of, the calendar year, prepared with an audit by an independent certified public accountant or an independent public accountant subject to approval by the director in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

An unqualified report, certificate, or opinion of the independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant subject to approval by the director who performs the audit, stating that the financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

Other information that the director may require.

If a person other than a licensee makes or keeps the books, accounts, or other records of that licensee, this chapter applies to that person with respect to the performance of those services and with respect to those books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if that person were the licensee.

If a person other than an affiliate or subsidiary of a licensee makes or keeps any of the books, accounts, or other records of that affiliate or subsidiary, this chapter applies to that person with respect to those books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if that person were the affiliate or subsidiary.

If the director considers it expedient, the director may require any particular licensee to obtain the approval of the director before permitting another person to make or keep any of the books, accounts, or other records of the licensee.

Each licensee, each affiliate of a licensee, and each subsidiary of a licensee shall file with the director such reports as and when the director may require. A report shall be in such a form and shall contain such information as the director may require.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2706, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2001, ch. 86, § 1, p. 221.

§ 26-2707. Annual report to legislature required.

The director shall publish annually and provide to the house business committee and senate commerce and labor committee, or the appropriate germane legislative committees, information on the impact of this chapter in promoting economic development in this state. At a minimum, the information shall include aggregate statistics on each of the following:

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to business firms.

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to business firms classified in broad categories of industry such as divisions of the standard industrial classification manual.

The number and dollar amount of provisions of financing assistance made by licensees to minority owned business firms and to woman owned business firms.

Estimates of the number of jobs created or retained.

Estimates of the number and dollar amount of any financial assistance provided to licensed BIDCOs, or investments in individual licensed BIDCOs, for the purpose of fostering economic development by any state or federal agency, or by public or quasi-public entities, including the public employee retirement system.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2707, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 2, p. 406.

§ 26-2708. Annual license review by director.

The director shall examine each licensee not less than once each calendar year to determine whether or not the licensee is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

The director may at any time examine a licensee or subsidiary of a licensee.

A director, officer, or employee of a licensee or of a subsidiary of a licensee being examined by the director, or a person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or records of the licensee or of the subsidiary, shall exhibit to the director, on request, any of the books, accounts, and other records of the licensee or of the subsidiary and shall otherwise facilitate the examination so far as it is in their power to do so.

If in the director’s opinion it is necessary in the examination of a licensee or of a subsidiary of a licensee, the director may retain a certified public accountant, attorney, appraiser, or other person to assist the director. Within ten (10) days after receipt of a statement from the director, the licensee being examined shall pay the fees of a person retained by the director under this subsection.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2708, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2709. Requirements for licensure.

An Idaho corporation may apply to the director for licensure as a BIDCO. A person other than an Idaho corporation shall not apply for a license.

After a review of information regarding the directors, officers, and controlling persons of the applicant, a review of the applicant’s business plan, including at least three (3) years of detailed financial projections and other relevant information, and a review of additional information considered relevant by the director, the director shall approve an application for a license if, and only if, the director determines all of the following:

The applicant has a net worth, or firm financing commitments which demonstrate that the applicant will have a net worth when the applicant begins transacting business as a BIDCO, in liquid form available to provide financing assistance, that is adequate for the applicant to transact business as a BIDCO as determined under subsection (3) of this section.

Each director, officer, and controlling person of the applicant is of good character and sound financial standing; each director and officer of the applicant is competent to perform his or her functions with respect to the applicant; and the directors and officers of the applicant are collectively adequate to manage the business of the applicant as a BIDCO.

It is reasonable to believe that the applicant, if licensed, will comply with this chapter.

The applicant has reasonable promise of being a viable, ongoing BIDCO and of satisfying the basic objectives of its business plan.

In determining if the applicant has a net worth or firm financing commitments adequate to transact business as a BIDCO, the director shall consider the types and variety of financing assistance that the applicant plans to provide; the experience that the directors, officers, and controlling persons of the applicant have in providing financing and managerial assistance to business firms; the financial projections and other relevant information from the applicant’s business plan; and whether the applicant intends to operate as a profit or nonprofit corporation. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the director shall require a minimum net worth of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) and not more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000). The director may require a minimum net worth of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), but not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), if, in the context of the applicant’s business plan, the initial capitalization amount is adequate for the applicant to transact business as a BIDCO because of special circumstances including, but not limited to, funded overhead, low overhead, or specialized opportunities.

For the purposes of subsection (2) of this section, the director may find any of the following:

That a director, officer, or controlling person of an applicant is not of good character if the director, officer, or controlling person, or a director or officer of a controlling person, has been convicted of, entered a plea of guilty to, has been found guilty of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

That it is not reasonable to believe that an applicant, if licensed, will comply with this chapter, if the applicant has been convicted of, entered a plea of guilty to, has been found guilty of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, subsection (4) of this section shall not be considered to be the only grounds upon which the director may find that a director, officer, or controlling person of an applicant is not of good character or that it is not reasonable to believe that an applicant, if licensed, will comply with the provisions of this chapter.
History.

I.C.,§ 26-2709, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 3, p. 406.

§ 26-2710. Preliminary approval — Denial in writing — Posting of license.

A person may apply to the director for preliminary approval of an application for a license. Notwithstanding that commitments to invest in the equity of the applicant have not been obtained and that all directors and officers of the applicant have not been identified, the director may grant preliminary approval. In issuing an order granting preliminary approval, the director shall indicate that, for the director to determine that the requirements of section 26-2709, Idaho Code, are satisfied, final approval is conditioned on review by the director of the applicant’s completion of fund-raising, including the controlling persons, and review by the director of the completion of the roster of directors and officers. If an application for preliminary approval has been granted, before granting final approval of the application for a license, the director may request an updated balance sheet and such other information considered relevant by the director.

If a person files an application under this section, the fee required in section 26-2705(1)(a), Idaho Code, is payable at the time the application is filed with the director.

If the director denies an application under this section or section 26-2709, Idaho Code, the director shall provide the applicant with a written statement explaining the basis for the denial.

If an application for a license is approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of that license are fulfilled, the director shall issue a license to the applicant. A licensee shall post the license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s principal office. A license is not transferable or assignable.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2710, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2711. Use of BIDCO name restricted — Exception.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person transacting business in this state, other than a licensee, shall not use a name or title which indicates that the person is a business and industrial development corporation including, but not limited to, use of the term “BIDCO,” and shall not otherwise represent that the person is a business and industrial development corporation or a licensee.

Before being issued a license under this chapter, an Idaho corporation that proposes to apply for a license or that applies for a license may perform, under a name that indicates that the corporation is a business and industrial development corporation, the acts necessary to apply for and obtain a license and to otherwise prepare to commence transacting business as a licensee. Such a corporation shall not represent that it is a licensee until after the license has been obtained. A licensee shall not misrepresent the meaning or effect of its license.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2711, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 4, p. 406.

§ 26-2712. Dual licensure — Exceptions.

An Idaho corporation that is licensed under another law of this state or under any law of the United States may apply for and be issued a license under this chapter unless the transaction of business by that corporation as a licensee under another law of this state or a law of the United States violates this chapter or is contrary to the purposes of this chapter.

An Idaho corporation that is licensed under this chapter may apply for and be issued a license under another law of this state or a law of the United States unless the transaction of business by that corporation as a licensee under another law of this state or a law of the United States would violate this chapter or would be contrary to the purposes of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2712, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2713. Surrender of license.

Upon approval of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its board of directors and after complying with subsection (2) of this section, a licensee may apply to the director to have the director accept the surrender of the licensee’s license. If the director determines that the requirements of this section have been satisfied, the director shall approve the application unless in the opinion of the director the purpose of the application is to evade a current or prospective action by the director pursuant to this chapter.

Not less than sixty (60) days before filing an application with the director under subsection (1) of this section, a licensee shall notify all of its shareholders and all of its creditors of its intention to file the application. Each creditor shall be notified of the right to comment to the director. Each shareholder shall be notified of the right to file with the licensee an objection to the proposed surrender of the license within the sixty (60) day period and shall be advised that, if the shareholder files an objection, the shareholder should send a copy of the objection to the director. If shareholders representing twenty percent (20%) of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee file an objection, the licensee shall not proceed with the application under subsection (1) of this section unless the application is approved by a vote of shareholders representing two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2713, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.

§ 26-2714. Corporate name — Directors — Dividends — Restriction on use of public moneys.

The corporate name of each licensee may include the phrase “Business and Industrial Development Corporation” or may include the word “BIDCO.” A licensee shall not transact business under a name other than its corporate name.

The board of directors of each licensee shall consist of not less than seven (7) directors. The board of directors of each licensee shall hold a meeting not less than once each calendar quarter.

Within thirty (30) days after the death, resignation, or removal of a director or officer; the election of a director; or the appointment of an officer, the licensee shall notify the director in writing of the event and shall provide any additional information which the director may require.

A licensee shall not pay, or obligate itself to pay, a cash dividend or dividend in kind to its shareholders, unless that payment is consistent with a dividend policy which has been adopted by the licensee and approved by the director. In reviewing dividend policies under this section, the director shall be flexible in recognizing the special characteristics of BIDCOs and the diverse range of potentially appropriate dividend policies for BIDCOs, while at the same time protecting against unsafe or unsound acts which could threaten the viability of the licensee as an ongoing BIDCO. The director may at any time withdraw any previous approval of a dividend policy if the director determines that the withdrawal is necessary to prevent unsafe or unsound acts.

Without the prior approval of the director, a licensee shall not buy back, or obligate itself to buy back a share of stock from a shareholder.

Any public moneys received by a licensee shall be applied by the licensee solely to providing financing assistance or management assistance to business firms with a home office in Idaho.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2714, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 5, p. 406.

§ 26-2715. Offices — Location.

A licensee shall maintain not less than one (1) office in this state.

A licensee, with the approval of the director, may maintain an office at any place outside this state.

Each office of a licensee shall be located in a place which is reasonably accessible to the public.

A licensee shall post in a conspicuous place at each of its offices a sign which bears the corporate name of the licensee.

A licensee shall maintain at each of its offices personnel who are competent to conduct the business of such an office.

Upon written notice to the director, a licensee may establish, relocate, or close an office.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2715, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2001, ch. 86, § 2, p. 221.

§ 26-2716. Business activities — Corporate powers.

The business of a licensee shall be the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms. A licensee shall not engage in a business other than the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms.

In addition to the powers and privileges provided to a licensee by this chapter, a licensee has all powers and privileges conferred by its incorporating statute which are not inconsistent with or limited by this chapter. The powers of a licensee include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

To borrow money and otherwise incur indebtedness for its purposes, including issuance of corporate bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness. A licensee’s indebtedness may be secured or unsecured, and may involve equity features including, but not limited to, provisions for conversion to stock and warrants to purchase stock.

To make contracts. Such contracts may include contracts to provide management assistance to business firms, which contracts shall be in writing, and the terms of which shall govern all aspects of the relationship between the licensee and the business firm regarding the management assistance provided by the licensee.

To incur and pay necessary and incidental operating expenses.

To purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise acquire, or to sell, convey, mortgage, lease, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, real or personal property, together with rights and privileges that are incidental and appurtenant to these transactions of real or personal property, if the real or personal property is for the licensee’s use in operating its business or if the real or personal property is acquired by the licensee from time to time in satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations.

To make donations for charitable, educational, research, or similar purposes.

To implement a reasonable and prudent policy for conserving and investing its money before the money is used to provide financing assistance to business firms or to pay the expenses of the licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2716, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601; am. 2002, ch. 145, § 6, p. 406.

§ 26-2717. Forms of financial and management assistance — Interest rates.

A licensee may determine the form and the terms and conditions for financing assistance provided by that licensee to a business firm including, but not limited to, forms such as loans; purchase of debt instruments; straight equity investments such as purchase of common stock or preferred stock; debt with equity features such as warrants to purchase stock, convertible debentures, or receipt of a percent of net income or sales; royalty based financing; guaranteeing of debt; or leasing of property. A licensee may purchase securities of a business firm either directly or indirectly through an underwriter. A licensee may participate in the program of the small business administration pursuant to section 7(a) of the small business act, Public Law 85-536, 15 U.S.C. 636(a) or any successor statute, or any other government program for which the licensee is eligible and which has as its function the provision or facilitation of financing assistance or management assistance to business firms. If a licensee participates in a program referred to in this subsection, the licensee shall comply with the requirements of that program.

Management assistance provided by a licensee to a business firm may encompass both management or technical advice and management or technical services.

Financing assistance or management assistance provided by a licensee to a business firm shall be for the business purposes of that business firm.

A licensee may exercise the incidental powers that are necessary or convenient to carry on the business of, or are reasonably related to the business of, providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms.

In connection with an extension of credit by a person to a licensee or an extension of credit by a licensee to a business entity, the parties may agree to any rate of interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2717, as added by 1989, ch. 252, § 1, p. 601.